District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

44-655

Medicaid outpatient hospital access payments.

Expired.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5076, 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 44-652, § 44-654, and § 44-656.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5076 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5076 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 5071 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle H of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Medicaid Hospital Outpatient Supplemental Payment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.